HunSpellDictionaries/af_ZA.dic
bekombaar/OHP
bekort/I
beleefdheid/MZ
bereis/O
beroemd/HT
beroepskode/S
bevolk/LOMI
blaaie/R
blinkerig/E
braaivleisvuur/JP
burgerplig/L
dag/VIMFBGA
deelperspektief/Z
deformeer/G
deurloop/P
diekant/T
diklywig/HE
donkermaan/V
drinker/S
dwing/FGCABK
erd/KVA
ervarenes/O
formosaans/E
frappeer/G
geargiveer/N
gebak/LUM
geblomde/OU
gebonde/CO
gedrup/CF
gegewe/AUMKC
gekla/UA
gekonstateer/N
gekook/KMFLUO
gelig/KFUC
geloop/KUACMF
gemarsjeer/AUK
gemeng/HCNO
gene/R
gesigsenuwee/A
geskakel/ACFMUNK
gesloof/FU
gespan/MCU
gespring/CFMKU
gestap/KFUCMA
gesteldheid/CZ
getroos/LO
gevis/UK
gevly/A
gevoelig/ETOMH
gevorder/NKV
gewekte/OK
giet/FMUBGCV
gifappel/JS
glyding/F
goedvertrouend/HE
gooi/AGCVFMKU
handelsending/S
heerlik/MHETV
hits/GAK
hoort/BG
hoërskoolleerling/E
inbraak/P
informeel/T
ingetuimel/N
inlaai/I
kant/AFMOG
katkiseer/G
klag/BAL
kleuring/V
kostesentrum/S
kou/FGJ
krapsel/SF
kreupel/EH
kyk/AFBGCKMVU
labirint/E
las/AMBGC
legger/USBC
lenige/R
liggaam/JPB
lossings/FKV
maagspoel/I
maaksels/A
mindering/V
modeleggenoot/P
mos/B
nag/MLV
negatief/STZ
noodoperasie/S
noodsaaklik/TEH
nuusgroep/E
obsedeer/G
om/L
onbestaanbaar/H
ontledig/I
onverwinlik/EH
oorbie/J
opvoedbaar/OPH
protestants/E
provokasie/S
pynlike/R
raak/UGFKTA
reis/FBVEUG
ren/GSL
resep/L
retrospektief/Z
reënvlaag/P
ritte/FK
ryer/AS
sakking/FUVC
seeboon/JP
skiet/BKVUMEAFGC
skilferagtig/E
skinder/GVB
skooleksamen/S
skop/UGMCKFV
skotte/MFV
skrompel/VGI
skuins/FHGLU
sluier/SVGI
soeker/ABSJV
soetsappig/HTE
soliede/ROC
sprot/L
stekel/SJG
stel/AGCFKEVBLU
steller/ABSFCKVJU
stemming/FCBES
straf/TBGH
streeksaangeleentheid/Z
streelster/S
suikerprodusent/E
swerm/GSUIA
swikking/V
teelt/C
temerig/TEH
temperatuur/P
teuel/CBS
troef/GMZ
trom/J
uiteenlopend/H
uitgeken/N
uitheemse/R
uitreik/I
verdien/ON
verkennend/E
verkleurmannetjie/S
vermors/LI
verniel/I
vet/LVECTH
voortyd/A
vrouagtig/H
weeklaag/G
weer/OJPGVFB
wisselvallige/R
wit/FGLMH
witter/SF
wolk/EB
wyd/TLGHVI
aangrypendheid/Z
afbakening/S
afbrekend/E
afgeperk/L
afgestuur/N
afkoopbare/O
antisiklonaal/P
begrepe/OC
bemoei/I
beslissend/TE
besmetlikheid/Z
betwiste/O
blaas/CMKFAGU
bloedige/ORS
bloese/MS
boekstander/J
boetvaardig/OEH
bonde/GV
booglyn/E
borg/GE
bring/AFGCMKU
byvoeg/I
denklik/EB
dien/UVGCAIKBST
dienskneg/L
dierbaar/HTP
digte/RGVO
dra/FBNGCMAKUV
etsnaald/E
faks/GE
fatsoenlike/ROM
filiaalwinkel/S
fisiokraat/P
flekteer/GC
geblink/U
gedane/AO
gedistribueer/N
gedurfde/A
gehaak/FCLUA
gehark/ALUK
geknypte/C
gekoop/ACLKU
gelap/AMLKU
gelei/BNUAFCK
gelyksoortig/EHO
gepaar/N
gereik/MU
geskoei/NO
geskud/KFU
gesluk/FCK
gesmokkel/NC
gesnel/AF
gestopte/K
gewas/UOACKL
gewikkel/FUAC
gewissel/FUC
geëer/OTN
glaas/V
grensgeveg/L
grote/RMVBS
herbegraaf/Z
huis/EVGB
inkluister/I
innemend/EH
judaïseer/G
kampe/R
keep/PGUC
konkretiseer/VG
kortsluit/GI
kruipers/MC
kwaliteit/E
lat/L
letterkundige/S
leuen/JS
leweringe/FMK
loot/GUV
mallerig/EH
mankoliek/ET
martel/IFG
minimumtarief/Z
misdadige/R
narkotiseer/G
neem/ABMGCVFKU
nies/GO
nodig/HOTUBE
onaangenaam/THV
ongedroom/N
ongeoefend/H
onontwarbaar/P
ontmunt/I
ontwerp/LE
opsegbaar/H
peil/EAIGCF
polys/GM
private/RO
pyl/CEFG
registrasie/S
regmaker/J
reiskaaf/Z
roemryk/EHT
sedewet/L
segregeer/G
seisoenaal/P
send/VMFGCUI
sit/MKUFBGVAC
skeur/JFGKECIUV
skrywe/BKAGUCSVFMR
slae/KAVCGMU
snoesige/R
spoeling/EUSV
sportiwiteit/O
stempligtig/HE
ster/ELJ
strand/IJGE
stuur/FSBGKUCMA
suppuratief/Z
tamboermeisie/S
tapbout/E
tennisbaan/P
toegespreek/L
trappe/R
trekking/MUVBCFAOES
tripleer/G
tuig/BOFGMK
twyfeling/V
uitgedoof/NO
vabond/JE
verkies/U
versteur/NO
vlag/BG
voldoen/NI
vreeslik/HTES
vyandelik/EH
wasbak/FK
welverdiende/R
wet/GEL
wetenswaardigheid/Z
aanskoulik/ETHV
angelier/E
anzac/S
askeet/P
bedees/N
beklimbaar/OP
benodigdheid/Z
betalend/HET
bevloei/I
blaker/SUG
blinke/RS
blinker/SJU
blywende/MAR
brand/UIGVAFECK
briesend/ET
daling/FES
deemoedig/HVE
degradeerde/G
direk/LC
dryf/CFGAMKUBZV
edelmoedige/O
eindeloos/H
fataal/P
fusie/C
gaan/KVSUBNMAGC
galm/SUEG
geboor/LKU
gedagvaarde/S
gefaktoriseer/N
geknip/FUAL
gekonkel/FM
geleentheid/ZAO
geloer/CFU
gelukke/O
gemainteneer/N
geneem/MACUFK
gepas/OALCK
geplaaste/OM
geredelike/R
geslowe/U
gesmeek/F
gestipuleer/N
gestruktureerd/O
gestudeerde/FOC
getuigskrif/L
gewerk/FACKU
gewig/MU
gifvry/E
haar/JFBNPV
halfhartig/EH
hoorbaar/TOPH
insuig/I
kaggel/JS
klaag/VBGAPU
klappe/RM
kleding/BACV
klik/GMV
knor/GB
konkordaat/P
kors/GBLVA
krapperige/R
lewensnoodsaaklikheid/Z
lopers/MU
losbare/OKF
loslywig/HE
lugspieëling/SE
luier/VCSG
lupien/E
meet/VGMUKAF
name/CFMAKV
nommer/MGFISJ
oeste/RG
offer/LKSG
okkultis/L
omgegooi/N
onverhelpbaar/P
onvervaard/H
oordeling/BV
oorrompel/NI
pampoen/JE
plegers/V
potent/ET
rampsaligheid/Z
reklameveldtog/L
rigting/EAKSFVC
rumoerige/R
saer/S
sitochroom/P
sketter/G
skryffoute/F
slim/HT
sluk/VGCFK
smaaklike/OR
snik/UG
snuffel/BSUG
soenerige/R
stamper/SJ
sterrewag/L
tasbaar/TASPOH
teergevoelig/EH
teleks/E
tipograaf/Z
toegespin/N
toor/BG
torring/FKUVG
treksel/USMF
trimester/S
troosters/V
uitspring/I
vakskool/P
veewagter/SJ
verborgene/SR
verpagte/O
verpulp/L
vyandig/EHT
waskunde/G
wegbrokkel/I
weggegooi/N
Afrikane/R
aanneemlikheid/Z
alleenwys/E
bedagsaam/HTPO
belastingtoegewing/S
belletjies/M
benoembaar/PH
betreurenswaardig/HET
betwisbaar/HPO
boorde/R
bottel/FJGSC
dagdief/Z
deling/CFVSMKEU
determinisme/C
deurtintel/I
doemeling/EV
donder/FMSKUG
dop/FGKUV
druk/FKMUALVBGC
duie/GAB
edik/L
fossiliseer/G
geartikuleer/NO
gedekte/FO
gekielhaal/N
geklink/AFCMK
geklop/FCUALK
gelapte/K
gelykdurig/EH
gepak/MKAFCU
gepaste/AOC
gesend/MFCU
geskematiseer/N
gesmelte/OC
gesproke/FUOA
geëg/NK
graag/LTO
grasbaan/P
groefskaaf/Z
gunstige/FRO
gyselaar/S
hanger/BJSAM
hopeloos/TH
inmekaargefrommel/N
jakke/RF
kaneel/J
kapitalisasie/M
koeling/V
koffiepit/L
koopprys/CFVA
kort/BHIFCEVT
kronkel/IGS
kwalifiseer/G
ledeland/E
lewer/SCMFGIKU
liefdesbrief/Z
litoloog/P
mededingend/HOTE
meevalle/R
mohammedaan/SP
nemers/KAF
ongelykmatig/H
ou/JNT
plesierigheid/Z
poligoon/P
posisioneel/PK
pretoriane/R
radeer/G
rekening/EVSU
roeringe/B
rokkel/F
saamgepers/NL
sandloper/S
seël/VSB
skuifel/IG
skuldiger/BO
skulpdier/EJ
sleep/CAFGUMK
spaar/BGKU
splits/FGI
sprinkel/BGCS
staak/PG
staan/AFBGCKUMNV
standvastig/EOH
stik/GV
stip/ATG
stroef/THZ
stu/KG
suiwer/GEUAHOIST
swel/KUAG
ta/LB
tand/JUGCIVE
teoreties/E
trekvisser/S
trou/OMVBGCA
veel/GVHSB
vergoddelik/I
verpas/L
versigtige/OMR
waks/EGM
walglikheid/Z
watersalamander/JS
wildplaas/P
wreed/PHT
wydversprei/N
afwissel/I
arresteer/G
attent/HO
balhorig/EH
bebaarde/S
bedarend/E
betref/A
bie/MJFRGVSK
blaarmotief/Z
blou/HTLJ
deurraam/P
draaglik/EOVH
drag/KBLVGM
drywe/AVBRGMFCKU
drywende/BF
fiks/OHTCFE
fyngesaag/N
gavot/L
gebinde/FAC
gedoen/LKMAF
geduik/CUK
gegrimeerde/O
gekalsineer/N
geland/A
geldowerheid/Z
gelykberegtig/NI
geoffer/K
geplatteer/N
geskinkte/C
gesteel/NF
gestoel/UL
gevlieg/UMAFCK
geïmpedieer/N
grafgrawer/S
groenvy/E
hartlik/HOE
heelkundig/ME
hoog/HVLKST
hulde/G
jammertoon/P
klopper/JUS
kompleet/TC
koopakte/V
kortings/VFC
leerstofeenheid/Z
leidings/CFGVA
lit/LG
lustig/HEOV
lyer/BS
melkhoutboom/P
menig/EL
moeilikste/S
moppe/R
mor/GES
môreoggend/M
neembare/OUVAF
neig/IG
onbeskryflik/EH
opgegraaf/N
ordentlik/ETOH
oue/JRS
pomp/GCKEUM
pondnoot/P
raarheid/Z
regter/SK
sap/V
seil/GCUFKEVABMJ
sekuriteitsmaatreël/S
selfgerig/L
seperig/EH
skets/EUGCF
skoothond/JE
slordig/EHT
snoei/IGBCF
souter/GC
souterig/THE
spaarsertifikaat/P
speld/AGUFCK
stote/KRAV
strooi/JVIGUB
suip/GKBVIU
superlatief/Z
timmer/KGFBV
toets/UGIE
tou/JAGC
trakteer/G
tuie/GKM
tweesnarig/E
uitspringing/ES
vanger/KVS
verklaar/ON
verkneukel/I
vestingmuur/P
voorbedagtelik/O
wag/FGCKVL
welvarend/HET
werkers/VBF
